Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.246, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Use of minor. (a) It is unlawful for a person to promote, employ, use or permit a minor to engage in or assist others to engage minors in posing or modeling alone or with others in any sexual performance or pornographic work if the person knows or has reason to know that the conduct intended is a sexual performance or a pornographic work. Any person who violates this paragraph is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than ten years, nor more than 25 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000deleted text begin , or bothdeleted text end . (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 15 years ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than 15 years, nor more than 30 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $40,000deleted text begin , or both,deleted text end if: (1) the person has a prior conviction or delinquency adjudication fornew text begin a sex offense, as defined in section 609.3455, subdivision 1, paragraph (h), ornew text end violating this section or section 617.247;new text begin ornew text end (2) the violation occurs when the person is a registered predatory offender under section 243.166deleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) the violation involved a minor under the age of 14 years. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.246, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Disseminationnew text begin for profitnew text end . (a) A person who, knowing or with reason to know its content and character, disseminates for profit to an adult or a minor a pornographic work, as defined in this section, is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years, ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than five years, nor more than 20 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000deleted text begin , or bothdeleted text end . (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 15 years ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than ten years, nor more than 25 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $40,000deleted text begin , or both,deleted text end if: (1) the person has a prior conviction or delinquency adjudication for new text begin a sex offense, as defined in section 609.3455, subdivision 1, paragraph (h), or new text end violating this section or section 617.247;new text begin ornew text end (2) the violation occurs when the person is a registered predatory offender under section 243.166deleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) the violation involved a minor under the age of 14 years. deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.247, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them: (a) "Pornographic work" has the meaning given to it in section 617.246. new text begin (b) "Receive" means to voluntarily and knowingly take into one's possession. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Sexual conduct" has the meaning given to it in section 617.246. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.247, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Dissemination new text begin or receipt new text end prohibited. (a) A person who disseminates pornographic work to an adult or a minornew text begin or receives a pornographic worknew text end , knowing or with reason to know its content and character, is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than seven years ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than three years, nor more than 20 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000deleted text begin , or bothdeleted text end . (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and deleted text begin may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 15 years ordeleted text end new text begin shall be committed to the commissioner of corrections for not less than ten years, nor more than 25 years, and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000deleted text begin , or both,deleted text end if: (1) the person has a prior conviction or delinquency adjudication for new text begin a sex offense, as defined in section 609.3455, subdivision 1, paragraph (h), or new text end violating this section or section 617.246;new text begin ornew text end (2) the violation occurs when the person is a registered predatory offender under section 243.166deleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) the violation involved a minor under the age of 14 years. deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.247, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Possession prohibited. (a) A person who possesses a pornographic work or a computer disk or computer or other electronic, magnetic, or optical storage system or a storage system of any other type, containing a pornographic work, knowing or with reason to know its content and character,new text begin or attempts to access the same with the intent to view pornographic work,new text end is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin fivedeleted text end new text begin tennew text end years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000deleted text begin , or bothdeleted text end . (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 15new text end years deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin and sentencednew text end to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000deleted text begin , or both,deleted text end if: (1) the person has a prior conviction or delinquency adjudication fornew text begin a sex offense, as defined in section 609.3455, subdivision 1, paragraph (h), ornew text end violating this section or section 617.246;new text begin ornew text end (2) the violation occurs when the person is a registered predatory offender under section 243.166deleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (3) the violation involved a minor under the age of 14 years. deleted text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 20 years and sentenced to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000 if the violation involved a minor under the age of 13 years. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 617.247, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Mandatory terms of probation. new text end new text begin If a person is convicted under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), and the court does not commit the offender to the custody of the commissioner of corrections, the court shall consider the following for inclusion as terms or conditions of probation: new text end new text begin (1) incarceration in a local jail; new text end new text begin (2) completion of an appropriate sex offender or psychosexual offender evaluation, with the requirement that all recommendations be successfully completed and complied with; and new text end new text begin (3) at least one of the following: new text end new text begin (i) no contact with minors; new text end new text begin (ii) no unsupervised contact with minors with consideration of who supervises the minors and how the minors are supervised; or new text end new text begin (iii) any contact with minors must be preapproved by the probation officer. new text end